District of Columbia statutes.
9-1109.07

Authorization for a District program.

(a)

If the Mayor at any time determines that the agreement authorized by § 9-1109.02 is not in the best interest of the District, the Mayor may terminate the District’s participation in the agreement and its duty to perform the responsibilities set out in § 9-1109.04(5) within the District.

(b)

If the Mayor assumes the responsibilities set out in § 9-1109.04(5) pursuant to a determination made under subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor may promulgate any necessary rules.

Sept. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-20, § 8, 44 DCR 4023
Acquisition of mass transit bus systems, repayment of advances, deferral, see § 9-1113.05.
1981 Ed., § 1-2445.7.
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 12-20, § 8a, concerning formation of a replacement independent interstate legal entity, see § 2 of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Safety Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-92, Mar. 23, 2016, 63 DCR 991).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 12-20, § 8a, concerning formation of a replacement independent interstate legal entity, see § 2 of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Safety Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-256, Jan. 6, 2016, 63 DCR 524).